Texas statutes.
HEALTH AND SAFETY CODE

TITLE 2. HEALTH

SUBTITLE D. PREVENTION, CONTROL, AND REPORTS OF DISEASES; PUBLIC HEALTH DISASTERS AND EMERGENCIES

CHAPTER 84. REPORTING OF OCCUPATIONAL CONDITIONS

Sec. 84.001. SHORT TITLE. This chapter may be cited as the Occupational Condition Reporting Act.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 245, Sec. 2, eff. May 23, 1997.

Sec. 84.002. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Health professional" means an individual whose:

(A) vocation or profession is directly or indirectly related to the maintenance of health in another individual; and

(B) duties require a specified amount of formal education and may require a special examination, a certificate or license, or membership in a regional or national association.

(2) "Occupational condition " means a disease, abnormal health condition, or laboratory finding that is caused by or is related to exposures in the workplace.

(3) "Reportable condition " means a disease, condition, or laboratory finding required to be reported under this chapter.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 245, Sec. 2, eff. May 23, 1997.

Sec. 84.003. REPORTABLE CONDITIONS; RULES. (a) Asbestosis and silicosis are occupational conditions that are reportable to the department.

(b) Blood lead levels in adults are laboratory findings that are reportable to the department as provided by department rule.

(c) The executive commissioner may adopt rules that require other occupational conditions to be reported under this chapter. Before the executive commissioner requires another occupational condition to be reported, the executive commissioner must find that the condition:

(1) has a well-understood etiology;

(2) results predominantly from occupational exposures; and

(3) is preventable.

(d) The executive commissioner shall maintain a list of reportable conditions.

(e) The executive commissioner shall adopt rules necessary to administer and implement this chapter.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 245, Sec. 2, eff. May 23, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.0258, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 84.004. REPORTING REQUIREMENTS. (a) The following persons shall report cases or suspected cases of reportable conditions to the department:

(1) a physician who diagnoses or treats the individual with the condition;

(2) a person who is in charge of a clinical or hospital laboratory, blood bank, mobile unit, or other facility in which a laboratory examination of any specimen derived from a human body yields microscopical, cultural, serological, or other evidence suggestive of the condition; and

(3) a health professional.

(b) The department may contact a physician attending a person with a case or a suspected case of an occupational condition.

(c) The executive commissioner shall prescribe the form and method of reporting. The executive commissioner may require the reports to contain any information necessary to achieve the purposes of this chapter, including the person's name, address, age, sex, race, occupation, employer, and attending physician.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 245, Sec. 3, eff. May 23, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.0259, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 84.005. POWERS AND DUTIES OF DEPARTMENT. (a) The department may enter into contracts or agreements as necessary to implement this chapter. The contracts or agreements may provide for payment by the state for materials, equipment, and services.

(b) The department may seek, receive, and spend any funds received through appropriations, grants, or donations from public or private sources for the purpose of identifying, reporting, or preventing those occupational conditions that have been determined by the executive commissioner to be injurious or to be a threat to the public health, subject to any limitations or conditions prescribed by the legislature.

(c) Subject to the confidentiality requirements of this chapter, the department shall evaluate the reports of occupational conditions to establish the nature and magnitude of the hazards associated with those conditions, to prevent the occurrence of those hazards, and to establish any trends involved.

(d) The department may make inspections and investigations as authorized by this chapter and other law.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 245, Sec. 4, eff. May 23, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.0260, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 84.006. CONFIDENTIALITY. (a) All information and records relating to reportable conditions are confidential. That information may not be released or made public on subpoena or otherwise, except that release of information may be made:

(1) for statistical purposes, but only if a person is not identified;

(2) with the consent of each person identified in the information released; or

(3) to medical personnel in a medical emergency to the extent necessary to protect the health or life of the named person.

(b) The executive commissioner shall adopt rules establishing procedures to ensure that all information and records maintained by the department under this chapter are kept confidential and protected from release to unauthorized persons.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 245, Sec. 5, eff. May 23, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.0261, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 84.007. INVESTIGATIONS. (a) The department shall investigate the causes of occupational conditions and methods of prevention.

(b) In performing the department's duty to prevent an occupational condition, the department's designee may enter at reasonable times and inspect within reasonable limits all or any part of an area, structure, or conveyance, regardless of ownership, that is not used for private residential purposes.

(c) Persons authorized to conduct investigations under this section may take samples of materials present on the premises, including samples of soil, water, air, unprocessed or processed foodstuffs, manufactured items of clothing, and household goods. If samples are taken, a corresponding sample shall be offered to the person in control of the premises for independent analysis.

(d) Persons securing the required samples may reimburse or offer to reimburse the owner for the materials taken, but the reimbursement may not exceed the actual monetary loss sustained by the owner.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 245, Sec. 6, eff. May 23, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.0262, eff. April 2, 2015.